Arkansas statutes. Title 8 Environmental Law
Chapter 3
Water and Air Pollution Generally

Subchapter 1
— General Provisions

Effective Dates.

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

8-3-101. Designation of air quality areas.

No area within Arkansas shall be redesignated by the state for the purposes of permitting under the Prevention of Significant Deterioration (PSD) of air quality requirements except by an act of the General Assembly.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 237, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-1941.1; Acts 1999, No. 114, § 1.

8-3-102. Ambient air quality standards — Hydrogen sulfide.

After review of scientific literature and similar standards in other states, the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission shall promulgate, through procedures set out in § 8-4-202, ambient air quality standards or other appropriate regulatory controls that will protect the public health and the environment from the emission of hydrogen sulfide.

Before the commission proposes an ambient standard or regulatory mechanism concerning hydrogen sulfide that will result in more stringent or restrictive control provisions than are currently provided by Division of Environmental Quality permitting practices, the commission shall direct the division to prepare, with the assistance and cooperation of state agencies with appropriate expertise, an economic impact and environmental benefit analysis justifying more stringent or restrictive operating conditions.

The economic impact and environmental benefit analysis shall include without limitation the:

Benefit to the public health;

Preservation of environmental quality; and

Cost to the regulated community and the division.

The conclusions of an economic impact and environmental benefit analysis shall be included in any public notice of the proposed rulemaking and shall be subject to public comment.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 856, § 1; 2009, No. 1199, § 4; 2019, No. 910, §§ 2450, 2451.

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment subdivided the section; substituted “an economic impact and environmental benefit” for “a cost/benefit” in (b)(1); inserted “economic impact and environmental benefit” in (b)(2); substituted “an economic impact and environmental benefit” for “this” in (b)(3); and made related and minor stylistic changes.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in (b)(1); and substituted “division” for “department” in (b)(1) and (b)(2)(C).

8-3-103. Hydrogen sulfide emissions — Definition.

Ambient Concentration Standard.

Except as provided in subsection (d) of this section, no person shall cause or permit emissions from any facility that result in predicted ambient hydrogen sulfide concentrations at any place beyond the facility's perimeter property boundary greater than eighty parts per billion (80 ppb) for any eight-hour averaging period for residential areas, or greater than one hundred parts per billion (100 ppb) for any eight-hour averaging period for nonresidential areas.

No person shall cause or permit emissions from any facility that result in actual ambient hydrogen sulfide concentrations at any place beyond the facility's perimeter property boundary greater than twenty parts per million (20 ppm) for any five-minute averaging period.

Method of Prediction. All estimates of ambient concentrations required under this section shall be performed by the Division of Environmental Quality or performed by the facility and approved by the division based on the facility's potential to emit hydrogen sulfide, the applicable air quality models, databases, and other requirements specified in the “Guideline on Air Quality Models (Revised)” (1986), supplement A (1987) and supplement B (1993).

Compliance Plan.

In the event the standard is predicted to be exceeded, the facility or facilities whose emissions are found to contribute to the excess shall be given a reasonable period of time to undertake measures to demonstrate compliance, such as a site-specific risk assessment that demonstrates that the emissions do not pose a risk to human health at the nearest public receptor, ambient monitoring, that demonstrates that the standard is not being exceeded, or undertaking emission reduction measures to reduce emissions of hydrogen sulfide such that the standard will not be exceeded.

The compliance measures and schedule of compliance shall be stated in an enforceable settlement agreement or permit modification or, if the facility does not have an existing permit, an enforcement order.

Control Technology Requirements.

General Requirements. Rather than demonstrate compliance with the ambient limit contained in subsection (a) of this section, a facility may elect to install and operate or continue to operate appropriate control technology that addresses hydrogen sulfide emissions for that source or source category.

Determination of Appropriate Control Technology.

For purposes of this section, “appropriate hydrogen sulfide control technology” means control technology, operational practices, or some combination thereof, which will result in the lowest emissions of hydrogen sulfide that a particular facility is reasonably capable of meeting, considering technological and economic feasibility.

Compliance with all applicable portions of the following technology standards, in accordance with the schedule set forth in such standards, shall be deemed to be compliance with appropriate hydrogen sulfide control technology:

Maximum Achievable Control Technology Standards issued pursuant to § 112 of the Clean Air Act, 42 U.S.C. § 7412, promulgated at 40 C.F.R. Part 63, when compliance with such standards will reduce hydrogen sulfide emissions;

Standards of Performance for New Stationary Sources, promulgated at 40 C.F.R. Part 60:

Standards of Performance for Petroleum Refineries, 40 C.F.R. Part 60, Subpart J;

Standards of Performance for Kraft Pulp Mills, 40 C.F.R. Part 60, Subpart BB;

Standards of Performance for Equipment Leaks of VOC in the Synthetic Organic Chemicals Manufacturing Industry, 40 C.F.R. Part 60, Subpart VV;

Standards of Performance for Equipment Leaks of VOC in Petroleum Refineries, 40 C.F.R. Part 60, Subpart GGG;

Standards of Performance for Equipment Leaks of VOC from Onshore Natural Gas Processing Plants, 40 C.F.R. Part 60, Subpart KKK; or

Standards of Performance for SO2 Emissions from Onshore Natural Gas Processing, 40 C.F.R. Part 60, Subpart LLL; or

National Emission Standards for Hazardous Air Pollutants under Title III of the Clean Air Act, 42 U.S.C. § 7601 et seq., and standards of performance promulgated pursuant to § 111(d) of the Clean Air Act, 42 U.S.C. § 7411(d), when compliance with such standards will reduce hydrogen sulfide emissions.

A facility that is not subject to one (1) of the technology limits listed in subdivision (d)(2)(B) of this section and that wishes to apply appropriate hydrogen sulfide control technology may apply to the division for a determination of appropriateness at any time, but no later than ninety (90) days after a determination that the ambient standard has been exceeded. The application shall be made on such forms and contain such information as the division may require and shall include a reasonable time schedule for implementation. When making a determination of appropriateness, the division shall follow the procedures used for making permitting decisions, including public participation requirements.

The ambient standard shall not apply to the following facilities:

Natural gas pipelines and related facilities that do not transmit gas with a concentration of hydrogen sulfide in excess of four parts per million (4 ppm);

Natural gas gathering and production pipelines and related facilities that do not transmit gas with a concentration of hydrogen sulfide in excess of thirty parts per million (30 ppm);

Brine pipelines that carry natural gas as a byproduct of the brine;

Wastewater treatment facilities; and

Oil and gas drilling and production operations and facilities from the wellhead to the custodial transfer meter as that term is defined by law.

The Oil and Gas Commission is hereby delegated the authority to set hydrogen sulfide standards for oil and gas drilling and production facilities from the wellhead to the custodial transfer meter.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 1136, § 1; 2019, No. 910, §§ 2452, 2453.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in (b); and substituted “division” for “department” in (b) and three times in (d)(2)(C).

U.S. Code.

The most recent version of the “Guideline on Air Quality Models”, referred to in this section, is codified at 40 C.F.R. Part 51, Appendix W.

Subchapter 2
— State Emission Plans — Procedures — Approval

Effective Dates.

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

8-3-201. Findings — Purpose.

The General Assembly finds that:

The United States Environmental Protection Agency has proposed emission guidelines for the regulation of carbon dioxide emissions from existing fossil-fuel-fired electric generating units under § 111(d) of the Clean Air Act, 42 U.S.C. § 7411(d);

The proposed guidelines will have a major impact on the economy of Arkansas by regulating how electricity is produced, transmitted, distributed, and consumed within the state;

The United States Environmental Protection Agency requires states to take the lead role in the regulation of existing fossil-fuel-fired electric generating units under § 111(d) of the Clean Air Act, 42 U.S.C. § 7411(d), by developing state plans for the establishment and implementation of performance standards for reducing carbon dioxide emissions from fossil-fuel-fired electric generating units;

The role of the United States Environmental Protection Agency is limited to establishing federal emission guidelines that assist the states in the development of their state plans to regulate carbon dioxide emissions from existing fossil-fuel-fired electric generating units and, in establishing federal emission guidelines, the United States Environmental Protection Agency must defer to the states regarding methods for regulating fossil-fuel-fired electric generating units within their jurisdictions; and

This subchapter expresses the intent of the General Assembly to exercise the powers of the General Assembly under Arkansas Constitution, Article 5, § 42, to:

Review and approve state agency rules;

Ensure that rules become effective only after review and approval by the legislative committee charged with review of the rules; and

Review rules during the interim or a regular, special, or fiscal session of the General Assembly.

The purpose of this subchapter is to ensure that:

Before the submission of a state plan to the United States Environmental Protection Agency, the rules of the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission that implement the state plan are reviewed and approved by the General Assembly through the Legislative Council consistent with Arkansas Constitution, Article 5, § 42, and any laws promulgated pursuant to Arkansas Constitution, Article 5, § 42; and

The state plan is reviewed through a transparent public process that assesses the full impact of the state plan on rates, reliability, employment, and manufacturing greenhouse gas leakage.

This subchapter does not create a private right of action for enforcement purposes.

History.

Acts 2015, No. 382, §
1; 2019, No. 315, § 445.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “rules” for “regulations” in (b)(1).

8-3-202. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

“Covered electric generating unit” means an existing fossil-fuel-fired electric generating unit within the state that is subject to regulation under federal emission guidelines;

“Federal emission guidelines” means a final rule, regulation, guideline, or other requirement that the United States Environmental Protection Agency may adopt for regulating carbon dioxide emissions from covered electric generating units under § 111(d) of the Clean Air Act, 42 U.S.C. § 7411(d); and

“State plan” means a plan to establish and enforce carbon dioxide emission control measures that the Division of Environmental Quality may adopt to implement the obligations of the state under the federal emission guidelines.

History.

Acts 2015, No. 382, §
1; 2019, No. 910, § 2454.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in (3).

8-3-203. State plan preferred — State plan dependent on federal emission guidelines.

This subchapter does not require the Division of Environmental Quality to develop a state plan to regulate carbon dioxide emissions from existing fossil-fuel-fired electric generating units under § 111(d) of the Clean Air Act, 42 U.S.C. § 7411(d).

However, submission of a state plan is the preferred method of compliance with federal emission guidelines.

Notwithstanding approval by the Legislative Council of submission of a state plan to the United States Environmental Protection Agency or submission by the Governor of a state plan under § 8-3-207, further action by a state agency to implement or enforce a final, approved state plan is dependent upon the final adoption of the federal emission guidelines.

If the federal emission guidelines are not adopted or are adopted and subsequently suspended or held to be contrary to law, a state agency shall suspend or terminate, as appropriate, further action to implement or enforce the state plan.

History.

Acts 2015, No. 382, §
1; 2019, No. 910, § 2455.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in (a)(1).

8-3-204. Appeal of state plan — Adjudicatory process.

If the Division of Environmental Quality proposes to finalize a state plan submittal for review and approval by the United States Environmental Protection Agency, the division shall comply with the procedural requirements for notice and public comment specified in § 8-4-317.

Only a person or an organization that submits comments on the record during the public comment period has standing to appeal the final decision of the division to the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission upon written application made within thirty (30) days after the service of notice made under § 8-4-317(b)(2)(A).

An appeal under subdivision (b)(1) of this section shall be processed as a permit appeal under § 8-4-205.

History.

Acts 2015, No. 382, §
1; 2019, No. 910, § 2456.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in (a); and substituted “division” for “department” in (a) and (b)(1).

8-3-205. Assessing effects of state plan.

Before completing a state plan for regulating carbon dioxide emissions from covered electric generating units, the Division of Environmental Quality shall prepare a report that takes into account the factors specified in § 8-4-312 and the Clean Air Act, 42 U.S.C. § 7401 et seq., as applicable.

In addition to the report specified in subsection (a) of this section, the division shall coordinate with the Arkansas Public Service Commission in the preparation of a report that assesses the effects of the state plan on the electric power sector, including without limitation:

The ability of the state to provide affordable electricity through diversified sources of electricity generation;

The type and amount of electric generating capacity within the state that is likely to withdraw from the state or switch to another fuel;

Stranded investment in electric generating and transmission capacity and other assets and infrastructure;

Potential risks to electric reliability within the state, including without limitation resource adequacy risks, transmission constraints, and natural gas supply and transmission adequacy; and

The amount by which retail electricity and any replacement fuel prices within the state are forecast to increase.

A rate impact assessment shall consider nonfuel costs, including generation, transmission, distribution, surcharges for renewable energy and energy efficiency, capital investment, upgrades to meet environmental requirements, utility profits, financing costs for new investments, unappreciated capital assets retired prematurely, and other nonfuel costs and surcharges, and the amount of funds contributed from all in-state taxpayers to local, state, and federal subsidies, grants, and credits to fund in-state electric generation sources, electric storage, and energy efficiency.

The division shall further coordinate with the Arkansas Economic Development Commission in the preparation of a report that assesses the effects of the state plan on the electricity consumers within the state, including without limitation:

Disproportionate impacts of electricity and other replacement energy price increases on middle-income and lower-income households;

Employment within the state, including without limitation direct and indirect employment effects and jobs potentially lost within affected sectors of the state's economy;

Economic development within the state, including without limitation effects on manufacturing, commercial, and other sectors of the state's economy;

The competitive position of the state in relation to neighboring states and other economic competitors; and

State and local governments, including without limitation potential impacts resulting from changes in tax revenues and higher government outlays for electric service.

The reports required by this section shall be included with any petition filed by the division to initiate rulemaking for rules that implement a state plan for regulating carbon dioxide emissions from covered electric generating units.

History.

Acts 2015, No. 382, §
1; 2019, No. 315, §§ 446, 447; 2019, No. 910, §§ 2457-2460; 2019, No. 934, § 2.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2019, No. 934, § 1, provided: “Legislative purpose. The purpose of this act is to:

“(1)

Create a means to waive procedures for legislative review and approval of state plans when final emission guidelines are promulgated by the United States Environmental Protection Agency under § 111(d) of the Clean Air Act, 42 U.S.C. § 7411(d), for electric generating units when those emission guidelines are determined to not require any one (1) or more of the following:

“(A)

Shifting electricity generation from one fuel type to another;

“(B)

Closing any fossil fuel-fired electric generating unit; or

“(C)

Imposing statewide greenhouse gas goals or other statewide greenhouse gas emission limitations; and

“(2)

Revise the requirements under § 8-3-201 et seq. pertaining to a state plan to ensure consistency with the Clean Air Act and to avoid the imposition of a federal plan.”

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 2019, No. 934, § 2 specifically amended subsection (a) of this section as amended by Acts 2019, No. 315.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 substituted “rules” for “regulations” in (a) and (c).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in (a); and substituted “division” for “department” in (b) and (c).

The 2019 amendment by No. 934 substituted “completing” for “preparing a petition to initiate rulemaking for the development of rules implementing” in (a).

8-3-206. Submission of state plan.

The Division of Environmental Quality shall not submit a state plan to the United States Environmental Protection Agency under § 8-3-207 if the state plan:

Results in a significant rate increase annually for any rate class of the total delivered electricity cost per kilowatt hour or of the total natural gas cost per thousand cubic feet; or

Results in unreasonable reliability risks.

The division shall not submit a state plan to the United States Environmental Protection Agency until:

The Legislative Council has approved the state plan under § 8-3-207(b); or

The Governor directs the submission of a state plan under § 8-3-207(d).

History.

Acts 2015, No. 382, §
1; 2019, No. 910, §§ 2461, 2462.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in (a); and substituted “division” for “department” in (b).

8-3-207. Procedures for approval of state plan.

Before transmitting a state plan to the Governor for submission of the state plan to the United States Environmental Protection Agency, the Division of Environmental Quality shall transmit to the cochairs of the Legislative Council a copy of the state plan and the accompanying report developed under § 8-3-205.

Upon receiving the state plan and the accompanying report transmitted under subsection (a) of this section and after sufficient time has been provided to assess the state plan and the accompanying report, the Legislative Council shall vote on approval of the state plan.

An affirmative majority vote of the Legislative Council is required for approval of the state plan.

If the Legislative Council fails to approve a state plan under subsection (b) of this section, the division may submit a revised version of the state plan, with an accompanying revised report, to the cochairs of the Legislative Council for approval under this section.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this subchapter, in the absence of legislative approval under subsection (b) of this section, the Governor may direct the submission of a state plan to the United States Environmental Protection Agency if, in his or her judgment:

Sufficient time has passed for the Legislative Council to consider a state plan submitted by the division for legislative approval;

Further delay would result in the failure to submit a state plan by the relevant deadline for submission; and

Failure to submit a state plan would likely result in the imposition of a federal implementation plan.

This subchapter does not eliminate the requirement of legislative approval of rules promulgated to implement or enforce the state plan subsequently to gubernatorial action under subsection (d) of this section.

History.

Acts 2015, No. 382, §
1; 2019, No. 315, § 448; 2019, No. 910, §§
2463-2465; 2019, No. 934, §§ 3, 4.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2019, No. 934, § 1, provided: “Legislative purpose. The purpose of this act is to:

“(1)

Create a means to waive procedures for legislative review and approval of state plans when final emission guidelines are promulgated by the United States Environmental Protection Agency under § 111(d) of the Clean Air Act, 42 U.S.C. § 7411(d), for electric generating units when those emission guidelines are determined to not require any one (1) or more of the following:

“(A)

Shifting electricity generation from one fuel type to another;

“(B)

Closing any fossil fuel-fired electric generating unit; or

“(C)

Imposing statewide greenhouse gas goals or other statewide greenhouse gas emission limitations; and

“(2)

Revise the requirements under § 8-3-201 et seq. pertaining to a state plan to ensure consistency with the Clean Air Act and to avoid the imposition of a federal plan.”

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (e).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in (a); and substituted “division” for “department” in (c) and (d)(1).

The 2019 amendment by No. 934 rewrote (a); and inserted “likely” in (d)(1).

8-3-208. Feasibility study.

If a state plan approved under this subchapter would result in a significant increase in the total electric or natural gas bill annually for any customer class as determined by the Arkansas Public Service Commission, the Division of Environmental Quality shall prepare a feasibility study to determine whether:

An alternative approach is consistent with the Clean Air Act, 42 U.S.C. § 7401 et seq.; or

The pursuit of implementing an alternative approach is likely to result in the imposition of a federal plan.

History.

Acts 2015, No. 382, §
1; 2019, No. 910, § 2466; 2019, No. 934, § 5.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2019, No. 934, § 1, provided: “Legislative purpose. The purpose of this act is to:

“(1)

Create a means to waive procedures for legislative review and approval of state plans when final emission guidelines are promulgated by the United States Environmental Protection Agency under § 111(d) of the Clean Air Act, 42 U.S.C. § 7411(d), for electric generating units when those emission guidelines are determined to not require any one (1) or more of the following:

“(A)

Shifting electricity generation from one fuel type to another;

“(B)

Closing any fossil fuel-fired electric generating unit; or

“(C)

Imposing statewide greenhouse gas goals or other statewide greenhouse gas emission limitations; and

“(2)

Revise the requirements under § 8-3-201 et seq. pertaining to a state plan to ensure consistency with the Clean Air Act and to avoid the imposition of a federal plan.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 2466, amended former subsection (b) of this section to replace “department” with “division”. However, Acts 2019, No. 934, § 5, specifically repealed this subsection.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in (a); and substituted “division” for “department” in (b)(1) and (b)(2).

The 2019 amendment by No. 934 deleted (b); and rewrote the remaining provisions.

8-3-209. Waiver of review and approval procedures for emissions plans.

The Division of Environmental Quality may seek a waiver of review and approval procedures for emissions plans from the Legislative Council if the division determines that final federal emission guidelines do not require any one (1) or more of the following:

Shifting generation from electric generating units powered by one fuel type to another fuel type;

Closing any fossil fuel-fired electric generating unit; or

Imposing a statewide greenhouse gas goal or other statewide greenhouse gas emissions limitation.

A request to the Legislative Council under subsection (a) of this section shall include an explanation of how the final emission guidelines for the regulation of carbon dioxide emissions from existing fossil fuel-fired electric generating units under § 111(d) of the Clean Air Act, 42 U.S.C. § 7411, do not require any of the factors in subsection (a) of this section.

The division shall not seek a waiver under subsection (a) of this section until the United States Environmental Protection Agency promulgates emission guidelines for the regulation of carbon dioxide emissions from existing fossil fuel-fired electric generating units under § 111(d) of the Clean Air Act, 42 U.S.C. § 7411(d).

An affirmative majority vote of the Legislative Council is required to grant a waiver of review and approval procedures for a state plan.

If the Legislative Council grants a waiver under this section, then all requirements in §§ 8-3-203 and 8-3-205 — 8-3-207 are waived.

If the Legislative Council grants a waiver under this section, the division may submit a state plan to the United States Environmental Protection Agency.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 934, § 6.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2019, No. 934, § 1, provided: “Legislative purpose. The purpose of this act is to:

“(1)

Create a means to waive procedures for legislative review and approval of state plans when final emission guidelines are promulgated by the United States Environmental Protection Agency under § 111(d) of the Clean Air Act, 42 U.S.C. § 7411(d), for electric generating units when those emission guidelines are determined to not require any one (1) or more of the following:

“(A)

Shifting electricity generation from one fuel type to another;

“(B)

Closing any fossil fuel-fired electric generating unit; or

“(C)

Imposing statewide greenhouse gas goals or other statewide greenhouse gas emission limitations; and

“(2)

Revise the requirements under § 8-3-201 et seq. pertaining to a state plan to ensure consistency with the Clean Air Act and to avoid the imposition of a federal plan.”